guesser/guess.verbs.lexd
PATTERNS
Verb
Noun

LEXICON DeclType
<TypeVerb>:[v]
<TypeNoun>:[n]

#-----------VERBS-----------

LEXICON Class
<cl>:в[1]
<cl>:й[2]
<cl>:б[3]
<cl>:р[4]

#-----------verbal-stems-----------

PATTERN Infinitive
PureInfinitive

PATTERN Aorist
PureAorist

PATTERN Imperative
PureImperative

LEXICON SingularVowel
<sg>:у
<sg>:и

LEXICON PluralVowel
<pl>:о
<pl>:а

#-----------verbal-patterns-----------

PATTERN Verb
Infinitive [<verb>:] DeclType[v] InfinititiveSuffixes > Particles
Aorist [<verb>:] [<aor>:] DeclType[v] Particles
Aorist [<verb>:] DeclType[v] AoristSuffixes > Particles
Imperative [<verb>:] DeclType[v] [<imp>:] Particles
Imperative [<verb>:] DeclType[v] [<imp>:] OptativeJussive > Particles

PATTERN InfinititiveSuffixes
[<inf>:у]
[<inf>:у] Purposive
Habitual
Future
PresentParticiple
[:у] Prospective
Future Counterfactual[|[бдур,ламдур]]

PATTERN AoristSuffixes
Perfect
Progressive
Progressive PresentParticiple[a]
PastParticiple
Progressive PresentConverb
PastConverb
[<aor>:] Conditional
Concessive
PastParticiple Counterfactual[дур]
Perfect Counterfactual[|[бдур,ламдур]]
[<aor>:] Counterfactual[ламдур]
[<aor>:] OptativeJussive

LEXICON Perfect
<pf>:дду
<pf>:й

LEXICON PastConverb
<cvb.pst>:дду
<cvb.pst>:й

LEXICON PastParticiple
<part.pst>:б
<part.pst>:иб
<part.pst>:м    # заменяет нм -> м в тволе

#LEXICON Plural
#<pl>:л
#<pl>:ил
#<pl>:ул

LEXICON Progressive
<progr>:р
<progr>:радо
<progr>:ралло
<progr>:мадо    # заменяет нм -> м в тволе
<progr>:малло   # заменяет нм -> м в тволе

LEXICON PresentConverb
<cvb.prs>:гужа

LEXICON PresentParticiple
<part.prs>:сси[a]
<part.prs>:я
<part.prs>:ия
<part.prs>:йа
<part.prs>:ийа

LEXICON OptativeJussive
<opt>:до

LEXICON Conditional
<cond>:бор
<cond>:мор      # ассимиляция нм -> мм

LEXICON Concessive
<conc>:болло
<conc>:молло    # ассимиляция нм -> мм
<conc>:боло
<conc>:моло     # ассимиляция нм -> мм

LEXICON Counterfactual 
<ctrf>:дур[дур]
<ctrf>:бдур[бдур]
<ctrf>:ламдур[ламдур]
<ctrf>:ламдури[ламдур]


LEXICON Habitual
<hab>:о
<hab>:е

LEXICON Purposive
<purp>:рий

LEXICON Future
<fut>:йа
<fut>:я
<fut>:ийа
<fut>:ия

LEXICON Prospective
<prsp>:лхъи
